Washington statutes.
RCW 19.330.100

Application of consumer protection act.

A violation of this chapter may not be considered a violation of the state consumer protection act, and chapter 19.86 RCW does not apply to this chapter. The remedies provided under this chapter are the exclusive remedies for the parties.

[ 2011 c 98 s 10.]